Vermont, session 2025-2026, H261.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Overtime * * *
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an employer shall not
pay an employee less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any
VT LEG #379766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.261
2025 Page 2 of 4
work done by the employee in excess of 40 32 hours during a workweek.
However, this subsection shall not apply to:
* * *
(4) Employees of hospitals, public health centers, nursing homes,
maternity homes, therapeutic community residences, and residential care
homes as those terms are defined in Title 18, provided:
(A) the employer pays the employee on a biweekly basis; and
(B) the employer files an election to be governed by this section with
the Commissioner; and
(C) the employee receives not less than one and one-half times the
regular wage rate for any work done by the employee:
(i) in excess of eight hours for any workday; or
(ii) in excess of 80 64 hours for any biweekly period.
* * *
* * * Employment of Children * * *
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 437 is amended to read:
§ 437. EMPLOYMENT OF CHILDREN; SPECIAL RESTRICTIONS;
HOURS FOR CHILDREN UNDER 16 YEARS OF AGE
* * *
(b) A child under 16 years of age shall not be employed more than eight
hours in any one day or more than 40 32 hours in any one week.
VT LEG #379766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.261
2025 Page 3 of 4
* * * Earned Sick Time * * *
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 482 is amended to read:
§ 482. EARNED SICK TIME
(a) An employee shall accrue not less than one hour of earned sick time for
every 52 41 hours worked.
* * *
(c) An employer may:
(1) limit the amount of earned sick time accrued pursuant to this section
to a maximum of 40 hours in a 12-month period; or
(2) limit to 40 32 hours the number of hours in each workweek for
which full-time employees not subject to the overtime provisions of the
Federal Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 213(a)(1), may accrue earned
sick time pursuant to this section.
* * *
* * * Short-Time Compensation Program * * *
Sec. 4. 21 V.S.A. § 1451 is amended to read:
§ 1451. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(7) “Usual weekly hours of work” means the normal hours of work for
full-time or part-time employees in the affected unit when that unit is operating
VT LEG #379766 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.261
2025 Page 4 of 4
on its regular basis not to exceed 40 32 hours and not including hours of
overtime work.
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379766 v.1